Maine, session 132, LD740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §3204, as amended by PL 2019, c. 220, §§1 and 2, is further
amended by enacting after the 4th paragraph a new paragraph to read:
Statements of a juvenile or of a juvenile's parents, guardian or legal custodian made to
a law enforcement officer or juvenile community corrections officer related to determining
whether to refer the juvenile to the Department of Health and Human Services for a juvenile
needs assessment pursuant to section 3207 are not admissible in evidence at an adjudicatory
hearing against that juvenile if a petition based on the same facts is filed prior to, in
conjunction with or subsequent to referral pursuant to section 3207.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §3207 is enacted to read:
§3207. Diversion; juvenile needs assessment
1. Pre-petition referral. A law enforcement officer who has probable cause to believe
that a juvenile has committed a juvenile crime or a juvenile community corrections officer
to whom a juvenile has been referred may, without taking the juvenile into custody and
prior to placing the juvenile under arrest or prior to filing a petition, refer the juvenile to
the Department of Health and Human Services, referred to in this section as "the
department," for a juvenile needs assessment pursuant to this section. A juvenile referred
to the department for a juvenile needs assessment may be released into the custody of the
juvenile's parents, guardian or legal custodian at the time of referral.
This section may not be construed to prohibit a law enforcement officer from taking into
custody a juvenile who is found violating any law, whose arrest would be permissible under
section 3201, who is reasonably believed to be a fugitive from justice or whose
circumstances endanger the juvenile's person or welfare unless immediate action is taken.
2. Informing of assessment; consent required. Prior to referring a juvenile to the
department for a juvenile needs assessment pursuant to this section, a law enforcement
officer or juvenile community corrections officer shall inform the juvenile and the
juvenile's parents, guardian or legal custodian about the purpose and procedures of the
juvenile needs assessment.
A. If, after being informed, the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian or legal
custodian consent to the department's conducting the juvenile needs assessment, the
law enforcement officer or juvenile community corrections officer shall refer the
juvenile to the department for this purpose.
B. If, after being informed, the juvenile or the juvenile's parents, guardian or legal
custodian do not consent to the department's conducting the juvenile needs assessment,
the law enforcement officer or juvenile community corrections officer may report the
denial of consent to the prosecutor and the Juvenile Court to which a petition is
submitted and proceed with arrest, detention, nonsecure placement or release of the
juvenile into the custody of the juvenile's parents, guardian or legal custodian, as
appropriate.
3. Juvenile needs assessment. The juvenile needs assessment conducted by the
department pursuant to this section must be based on and informed by high-fidelity
wraparound principles. The assessment must be conducted by persons with comprehensive
training in the use of the evidence-based, strength-based needs assessment instrument
Page 1 - 132LR0930(01)

414 designed for holistic, comprehensive assessment of behavioral and emotional needs, child
425 life functioning, child risk behaviors, ethnic and cultural factors, child strengths, caregiver
436 strengths and family needs. The juvenile needs assessment must be designed to identify the
447 supports and services needed to promote child and family well-being and to inform the
458 development of an individual wraparound plan that specifies the goals and action to be
469 taken to address the medical, educational, social therapeutic or other services needed by a
570 juvenile and the juvenile's family.
4. Timing of assessment; applicability of previous assessment. The department shall
complete a juvenile needs assessment pursuant to this section within 60 days following
referral of a juvenile to the department. If a juvenile needs assessment was completed for
the juvenile pursuant to this section within the 6 months prior to referral, the department
shall provide the referring law enforcement officer or juvenile community corrections
officer with the report and recommendations created pursuant to subsection 5 from that
prior assessment.
5. Report and recommendations. After conducting a juvenile needs assessment
pursuant to this section, the department shall create a report outlining the scope of the
assessment that was conducted with specific recommendations regarding whether a petition
should be filed and recommendations for supports and services. The report and
recommendations must be provided to the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian or
legal custodian, the juvenile's attorney and the law enforcement officer or juvenile
community corrections officer who recommended referral of the juvenile to the department
in accordance with subsection 1.
6. Referral to coordination services. If the juvenile needs assessment report pursuant
to subsection 5 concludes that the juvenile has complex behavioral health needs and is at
risk of residential, hospital or secure placement or is already involved in multiple service
systems, the department shall refer the juvenile and juvenile's parents, guardian or legal
custodian to high-fidelity wraparound care coordination services.
7. Petition following assessment. If a petition is filed following a juvenile needs
assessment conducted pursuant to this section, prior to filing the petition, the law
enforcement officer or juvenile community corrections officer who referred the juvenile to
the department and the prosecutor filing the petition shall review the department's report
and recommendations created pursuant to subsection 5 to screen the juvenile for
participation in other available voluntary services or diversion programs.
8. Petition prior to assessment. A petition may be filed prior to or in conjunction with
the juvenile's referral to the department and completion of the juvenile needs assessment
pursuant to this section if the prosecutor or arresting law enforcement officer or juvenile
community corrections officer who referred the juvenile to the department determines that
there is a need to request an order from the Juvenile Court for immediate detention or
nonsecure placement to protect the safety of the juvenile or the public. If such a petition is
filed and a juvenile is referred to the department for a juvenile needs assessment in
accordance with this section, the petitioner must identify the reasons for which diversion
was not an appropriate disposition prior to seeking court involvement. If the petition is filed
prior to the referral and juvenile needs assessment, and the juvenile has not had a juvenile
needs assessment pursuant to this section in the prior 6 months, the department shall
conduct the juvenile needs assessment and create a report and recommendations pursuant
Page 2 - 132LR0930(01)

416 to subsection 5. The report and recommendations created pursuant to this subsection are
427 subject to use in adjudicatory proceedings in accordance with subsection 9.
9. Use of report and recommendations in adjudicatory proceedings. Absent the
consent of the juvenile following consultation with counsel, the report and
recommendations developed pursuant to subsection 5, any additional documents and
records and any statements made by the juvenile or others providing information for the
purpose of a juvenile needs assessment pursuant to this section cannot be used for any
purpose by a law enforcement agency during any portion of its investigation and such
evidence is not admissible in any subsequent adjudicatory hearing pertaining to the
juvenile. Upon any ruling made at an adjudicatory hearing, the report and recommendations
may, with the consent of the juvenile following consultation with counsel, be used at the
dispositional hearing and subsequent hearings for the purpose of determining appropriate
supports and services for the juvenile.
Sec. 3. Implementation stakeholder group. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall convene an implementation stakeholder group to assist in the
implementation of the juvenile needs assessment established in the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 15, section 3207. The group shall develop processes to educate and train relevant
persons and entities in all matters related to the juvenile needs assessment, including the
purpose of the juvenile needs assessment, and in procedures for its use. Relevant persons
and entities must include, but are not limited to, law enforcement officers, law enforcement
agencies, juvenile community corrections officers, prosecutors involved in the juvenile
justice system, defense attorneys who represent juveniles in petition proceedings,
behavioral health staff within the department, judges and advocates and other community
members. Membership of the implementation stakeholder group must include, at a
minimum, the following:
A. The medical director of children's behavioral health services within the Department
of Health and Human Services, Office of Child and Family Services;
B. The Associate Commissioner for Juvenile Services within the Department of
Corrections;
C. A law enforcement educator;
D. A prosecutor involved in the prosecution of juvenile crimes in this State;
E. A defense attorney involved in representing juveniles in petition hearings in this
State;
F. A judge or justice with experience in juvenile justice proceedings;
G. A representative of a restorative justice program or other program designed to divert
juveniles from the juvenile justice system;
H. A person with expertise and experience in promoting the interests of youths
involved in the juvenile justice system; and
I. A person with expertise and experience in child development and the developmental
approach to juvenile justice reform.
Sec. 4. Effective date. That section of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 15, section 3204 and that section of this Act that enacts Title 15, section
3207 take effect January 1, 2026.
Page 3 - 132LR0930(01)